Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 3. Injunction.

Collateral references. —

42 Am. Jur. 2d, Injunctions, § 1 et seq.

43A C.J.S., Injunctions, § 1 et seq.

Power to enjoin, canvassing votes and declaring result of election, 1 ALR2d 588.

Removal of child from state in violation of injunction order as affecting jurisdiction of courts of another state to award custody, 4 ALR2d 7.

Injunction by state court against action in court of another state, 6 ALR2d 896.

Injunction against breach of contract for will or conveyance of property at death in consideration of support or services, 7 ALR2d 1178.

Public utility rates, adequacy, as regards right to injunction, of other remedy for review of order fixing, 8 ALR2d 839.

Injunctive relief against, other than lease or agreement therefor, or contract for services, terminable by one party but not the other, 8 ALR2d 1208.

Dismissal of suit as nullifying previous temporary injunction, 11 ALR2d 1411.

Declaratory relief with respect to unemployment compensation as within statutes forbidding injunctive relief, 14 ALR2d 836.

Mandatory injunction prior to hearing of case, 15 A.L.R.2d 213.

Enforcement of personal covenant in recorded deed by injunction against grantee’s lessee or successor, 23 ALR2d 527.

Decree granting or refusing injunction as res judicata in action for damages in relation to matter concerning which injunction was asked in first suit, 26 ALR2d 446.

Injunction against procuring contract, 26 ALR2d 1227, 96 ALR3d 1294, 44 ALR4th 1078.

Mandatory injunction to compel removal of encroachments by adjoining landowner, 28 ALR2d 679; 65 ALR4th 603.

Injunction as remedy against removal of public officer, 34 ALR2d 554.

Remedies to compel municipal officials to enforce zoning regulations, 35 ALR2d 1135.

Injunction against parking vehicles on private way, 37 ALR2d 944.

Bankruptcy court’s injunction against mortgage or lien enforcement proceedings commenced, before bankruptcy, in another court, 40 ALR2d 663.

Injunction as remedy against defamation of person, 47 ALR2d 715.

Injunction to prevent insured from settling suit against wrongdoer to detriment or insurer, 51 ALR2d 726.

Injunction against attorney’s representation of interest adverse to that of former client, 52 ALR2d 1276.

Dismissal of suit as conclusively establishing that temporary injunction had been improvidently granted, 54 ALR2d 505.

Injunction against divorce or separation suit in another state or country, 54 ALR2d 1240.

Necessary parties defendant to independent action on injunction bond, 55 ALR2d 545.

Injunction against repeated or continuing trespass involving waters and water rights, 60 ALR2d 310.

Injunction against repeated or continuing trespass on real property, 60 ALR2d 358.

Wording injunction in terms avoiding disclosure of trade secret or the like, 62 ALR2d 530.

Restraining order in favor of adverse claimant as affected by statute relating to notice, 62 ALR2d 1124.

Injunction against infringement of copyright of telephone directory, 63 ALR2d 1103.

Financial hardship or inability to pay tax as rendering inapplicable statute denying remedy by injunction against assessment or collection of tax, 65 ALR2d 550.

Duty to minimize damages for wrongful injunction, 66 ALR2d 1131.

Arbitrators’ power to award injunctions, 70 ALR2d 1055.

Prerequisite to issuance of temporary restraining order, 73 ALR2d 854.

Extraterritorial recognition of, and propriety of counterinjunction against, injunction against actions in courts of other states, 74 ALR2d 828.

Right of private sewerage system owner to mandatory injunction for removal of unauthorized sewerage connection, 76 ALR2d 1329.

Injunction to prevent interference with operations under standing timber contract providing that trees to be cut and order of cutting shall be as selected by seller, 79 ALR2d 1243.

Reviewability, on appeal from final judgment, of interlocutory order relating to injunction, as affected by fact that order was separately appealable, 79 ALR2d 1397.

Court’s lack of jurisdiction of subject matter in granting injunction as a defense in action on injunction bond, 82 ALR2d 1064.

Practice of exacting usury as ground for injunction, 83 ALR2d 848.

Injunction against acts constituting offense of official oppression, 83 ALR2d 1016.

Power of trial court to enjoin previous affirmance, 85 ALR2d 772.

Injunctive relief as to contract between grower of vegetable or fruit crops, and purchasing processor, packer, or canner, 87 ALR2d 779.

Dismissal without prejudice as breach of injunction bond, 91 ALR2d 1312.

Period for which damages are recoverable or are computed under injunction bond, 95 ALR2d 1190.

Federal Rule 65(d) and state counterparts:
who are persons “in active concert or participation” with parties to action so as to be bound by order granting an injunction, 97 ALR2d 490.

Appealability of order granting, extending, or refusing to dissolve temporary restraining order, 19 ALR3d 403.

Propriety of permanently enjoining one guilty of unauthorized use of trade secret from engaging in sale or manufacture of device in question, 38 ALR3d 572.

Propriety of injunctive relief against diversion of water by municipal corporation or public utility, 42 ALR3d 426.

Preliminary mandatory injunction to prevent, correct, or reduce effects of polluting practices, 49 ALR3d 1239.

Proceedings for injunction or restraining order as basis of malicious prosecution action, 70 ALR3d 536.

Sec. 09.40.230.
Authorization for injunction.

When it appears that (1) the plaintiff is entitled to the relief demanded, and the relief or any part of it includes restraining the commission or continuance of some act, the commission or continuance of which during the litigation would produce injury to the plaintiff; or (2) the defendant is doing, or threatens or is about to do, or is procuring or suffering to be done some act in violation of the plaintiff’s rights concerning the subject of the action and tending to render the judgment ineffectual; or (3) the defendant threatens or is about to remove or dispose of property or a part of it with intent to delay or defraud creditors, an injunction may be allowed to restrain such act, removal, or disposition.

History.

(§ 19.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For court rule on injunctions, see Civ.
R. 65.

Sec. 09.40.235.
Restraining orders, preliminary injunctions, and stays affecting industrial operations.

Unless exempt under AS

09.68.040(a)

, a party seeking a restraining order, preliminary injunction, or order staying the operation of a permit that affects an industrial operation shall give security, in an amount the court considers proper, for costs that may be incurred and damages that may be suffered by the industrial operation if the industrial operation is wrongfully enjoined or restrained. Upon request of any party and when that party presents evidence, one relevant factor the court shall consider is the amount of wages and benefits for employees and payment to contractors and subcontractors of the industrial operation that may be suffered if the industrial operation is wrongfully enjoined or restrained. In this subsection, “industrial operation” includes a construction, energy, or timber activity and oil, gas, and mineral exploration, development, and production.

The existence of security under (a) of this section does not

prohibit a person who is wrongfully enjoined or restrained from obtaining relief that may be available to that person; or

limit the amount that a party may recover in the action.

A party is not required to give security under (a) of this section if the challenged permitting decision or authorization is made by

the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS 46.03 or AS 46.14 in a program approved or delegated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or

the Department of Natural Resources under AS 27.21 in a program approved or delegated by the Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement in the United States Department of the Interior.

History.

(§ 1 ch 111 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 09.40.230(b) — (d).
Renumbered in 2014.

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 111, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect November 2, 2014.